Utah statutes.
31A-40-301.   Licensing required.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person may not engage in
the following before the day on which the person is licensed under this
chapter:
(a)  providing a professional employer service in this state;
(b)  advertising that the person provides a professional employer service in
this state; or
(c)  holding itself out as providing a professional employer service in this
state.
(2)  A person described in Subsection (1) is subject to this chapter
regardless of whether the person uses one of the following terms with or
without the term "registered" or "licensed":
(a)  "administrative employer";
(b)  "employee leasing company";
(c)  "professional employer organization";
(d)  "PEO";
(e)  "staff leasing company"; or
(f)  another name.
